North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-28 Guardians of Incapacitated Persons
30.1-28-12.2.
Restrictions on visitation, communication, and interaction with the ward — Removal of restriction.

If it is in the best interests of the ward, a guardian may restrict visitation, communication, and interaction with the ward.

A family member, friend, the ward, clergy member, attorney, agency charged with the protection of vulnerable adults, or other interested person may move the court to remove the restriction on visitation, communication, and interaction with the ward.

The motion must state:

The movant’s relationship to the ward;

Whether the guardian is unreasonably or arbitrarily denying or restricting visitation, communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward; and

The facts supporting the movant’s allegation that the guardian is unreasonably or arbitrarily denying or restricting visitation, communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward.

The movant shall serve the motion on the guardian, the ward, the ward’s spouse, and any other interested person.

The court shall set a hearing on the motion and provide notice of the hearing to the movant, the guardian, the ward, the ward’s spouse, and any other interested person.

The court shall take into consideration the ward’s wishes, and may conduct an in-camera interview with the ward and appoint a visitor or guardian ad litem.

If the court grants the motion for visitation, communication, or interaction, the court may impose conditions on visitation, communication, and interaction between the restricted party and the ward.

If the visitation, communication, or interaction is not in the best interests of the ward, the court may prohibit visitation, communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward.

The court may award reasonable costs and attorney’s fees to the prevailing party if the court finds:

The guardian unreasonably, arbitrarily, or in bad faith denied or restricted visitation, communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward; or

The motion was frivolous.

Costs and attorney’s fees awarded against the guardian may not be paid from the ward’s estate.

If a movant for visitation, communication, and interaction states the ward’s health is in significant decline or the ward’s death may be imminent, the court shall conduct an emergency hearing on the motion as soon as practicable but not later than fourteen days after the date the motion is filed or at a later date upon a showing of good cause.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 256, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

30.1-28-13. (5-313)
Proceedings subsequent to appointment — Venue.

The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or in which acceptance of a testamentary appointment was filed, over resignation, removal, accounting, and other proceedings relating to the guardianship, including proceedings to limit the authority previously conferred on a guardian, or to remove limitations previously imposed.

If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, in this or another state, and after consultation with that court determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever may be in the best interest of the ward. A copy of any order accepting a resignation, removing a guardian, or altering a guardian’s authority shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1; 1983, ch. 313, § 10.

Collateral References.

Service of process: construction and effect of provision for service of process against minor on a parent, guardian, or other designated person, 92 A.L.R.2d 1336.

30.1-28-14.
Guardianships established before July 1, 1990.

The powers and duties of guardians and the rights and privileges of wards under guardianships established before July 1, 1990, are as provided by this chapter as it existed on June 30, 1990, and are not affected by chapter 405 of the 1989 Session Laws, except that guardians appointed before July 1, 1990, must comply with the requirements of subsections 2, 4, 5, and 8 of section 30.1-28-12.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 405, § 13; 1991, ch. 350, § 1.

30.1-28-15.
Appointment of successor guardian.

If the appointment of a successor guardian is required, the current guardian or any interested person may file a motion with the court for the appointment of a successor guardian.

The motion and supporting documents must be served on the ward, the ward’s guardian ad litem, and every other interested person who has made an appearance or requested notice of proceedings.

A notice of motion must accompany the motion and must include a statement that provides an opportunity for hearing if requested in regard to the appointment of a successor guardian.

If the current or former guardian serves or served as a public administrator or a corporate guardian with more than ten wards, the motion and notice of motion may be served by first-class mail. The public administrator or corporate guardian shall then provide written notice of the motion to the state office of the protection and advocacy project, along with the contact information for each ward and proposed guardian.

If a hearing is not requested by or on behalf of the ward listed in the notice, the court may sign an order appointing a successor guardian for that ward.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 292, § 1.